Hawaii statutes.
§576B-507 Administrative enforcement of
orders. (a) A party or support enforcement agency seeking to enforce a
support order or an income withholding order, or both, issued in another state or
a foreign support order may send the documents required for registering the
order to a support enforcement agency of this State.

(b) Upon receipt of the documents, the support
enforcement agency, without initially seeking to register the order, shall
consider and, if appropriate, use any administrative procedure authorized by
the law of this State to enforce a support order or an income withholding
order, or both. If the obligor does not contest administrative enforcement,
the order need not be registered. If the obligor contests the validity or
administrative enforcement of the order, the support enforcement agency shall
register the order pursuant to this chapter. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L
2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next